Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB761.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4706 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 4706. Prohibition on expenditures for emission inspection program.* * *(h.1) Revised State implementation plan.--(1) Within 60 days of the effective date of this paragraph, the Department of Environmental Protection shall initiate the process of removing the following counties from the enhanced vehicle emission inspection and maintenance program:(i) A county of the third class with a population between 215,000 and 216,000 based on the most recent 123456789101112131415161718 Federal decennial census.(ii) A county of the third class with a population between 325,000 and 326,000 based on the most recent Federal decennial census.(iii) A county of the third class with a population between 354,000 and 355,000 based on the most recent Federal decennial census.(iv) A county of the fourth class with a population between 133,000 and 134,000 based on the most recent Federal decennial census.(v) A county of the fifth class with a population between 122,000 and 123,000 based on the most recent Federal decennial census.(vi) A county of the fifth class with a population between 114,000 and 115,000 based on the most recent Federal decennial census.(vii) A county of the fifth class with a population between 110,000 and 111,000 based on the most recent Federal decennial census.(1.1) For a county that is not removed from the enhanced vehicle emission inspection and maintenance program through the process initiated under paragraph (1) and prior to the effective date of this paragraph was subject to the enhanced vehicle emission inspection and maintenance program, the Department of Environmental Protection shall initiate the process of removing the county from the enhanced vehicle emission inspection and maintenance program if the Department of Environmental Protection can demonstrate that the county can maintain the relevant standards without benefit of the emissions reductions attributable to the vehicle emission 20250HB0761PN0785 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 inspection and maintenance program.(2) The revised State implementation plan shall be completed and submitted to the United States Environmental Protection Agency no later than January 1, 2026, and shall demonstrate that the counties listed under paragraph (1) can maintain the relevant standards without benefit of the emissions reductions attributable to the vehicle emission inspection and maintenance program.(2.1) In addition to the revised State implementation plan submitted under paragraph (2), the Department of Environmental Protection shall complete and submit a revised State implementation plan no later than 180 days after initiating the process under paragraph (1.1).( 3) The Department of Environmental Protection shall comply with Federal law during the process of the revisions , including by ensuring that the revisions will not interfere with attainment requirements or reasonable further progress toward attainment, and that Federal funding is not negatively impacted as a result of the revisions . (4) The Department of Environmental Protection shall notify the following of its submission of a revised State implementation plan , as required to be submitted under this subsection, to the United States Environmental Protection Agency:(i) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Environmental Resources and Energy Committee of the Senate.(ii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Environmental and Natural Resource Protection Committee of the House of Representatives.20250HB0761PN0785 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the Senate.(iv) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives.(5) Upon approval by the United States Environmental Protection Agency of a revised State implementation plan, the Secretary of Environmental Protection shall transmit notice of the approval to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0761PN0785 - 4 - 123456789101112